Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-303.09
Injunction, declaratory judgment, written assurance; violation; penalty.

Any person who willfully violates the terms of an injunction or declaratory judgment of the court or the terms of a written assurance of voluntary compliance entered into pursuant to the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1974, LB 327, § 11;

Laws 1990, LB 656, § 23.